Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. In General

§§ 35-13-101 through 35-13-104.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §§

16-6-501

through

16-6-504

by Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to present provisions relating to facilities in public buildings for physically handicapped, see §§

16-6-501

through

16-6-504

.

§ 35-13-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 30, § 5, related to approval of public construction by state fire marshall.